src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-aakíí_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - aakiiwa - ok : # -m animate noun, woman AEW NA1
     aakiiwa+NA+Sg: aakiiwa
     aakiiwa+NA+Pl: aakiiksi
     aakiiwa+NA+Obv: aakiiyi
     aakiiwa+NA+Non: aakii
     
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitaakiiwa, nitaakiima ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitaakiiksi, nitaakiimiksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ nitaakiiyi, nitaakiimi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitaakii, nitaakiimi ]
     
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitaakiinnaana, nitaakiiminnaana ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitaakiinnaaniksi, nitaakiiminnaaniksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ nitaakiinnaani, nitaakiiminnaani ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitaakiinnaani, nitaakiiminnaani ]

     aakiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitaakiinnoona, kitaakiiminnoona ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitaakiinnooniksi, kitaakiiminnooniksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ kitaakiinnooni, kitaakiiminnooni ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitaakiinnooni, kitaakiiminnooni ]

     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitaakiiwa, kitaakiima ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitaakiiksi, kitaakiimiksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ kitaakiiyi, kitaakiimi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitaakii, kitaakiimi ]

     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitaakiiwaawa, kitaakiimoaawa ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitaakiiwaawaiksi, kitaakiimoaawaiksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ kitaakiiwaawayi, kitaakiimoaawayi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitaakiiwaawai, kitaakiimoaawai ]

     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ otaakiiyi, otaakiimi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otaakiiksi, otaakiimiksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ otaakiiyi, otaakiimi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ otaakii, otaakiimi ]

     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ otaakiiwaayi, otaakiimoaayi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otaakiiwaawaiksi, otaakiimoaawaiksi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ otaakiiwaawayi, otaakiimoaawayi ]
     aakiiwa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ otaakiiwaawai, otaakiimoaawai ]
